Hawaii, session 2026, SB2737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 710, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§710-    Failure to report bribery; state elected officials.  (1) A state elected official commits the offense of failure to report bribery when the elected official: (a)  Knows that: (i)  A person has conferred, offered, or agreed to confer, directly or indirectly, any pecuniary benefit upon the elected official with the intent to influence the elected official's vote, opinion, judgment, exercise of discretion, or other action in the elected official's official capacity in violation of section 710-1040(1)(a); or (ii)  The elected official has witnessed: (A)  A person confer, offer, or agree to confer, directly or indirectly, any pecuniary benefit upon another state elected official with the intent to influence that elected official's vote, opinion, judgment, exercise of discretion, or other action in that elected official's official capacity in violation of section 710-1040(1)(a); or (B)  Another state elected official solicit, accept, or agree, directly or indirectly, any pecuniary benefit with the intent that the elected official's vote, opinion, judgment, exercise of discretion, or other action as an elected official will thereby be influenced in violation of section 710-1040(1)(b); and (b)  Fails to report the known or witnessed conduct within sixty days after the date the elected official knew of or witnessed the conduct.  For the purposes of this paragraph, a report made in good faith within the sixty-day period to any of the following shall satisfy the reporting requirement: (i)  The department of the attorney general; (ii)  The prosecuting attorney of the county where the conduct occurred or where the reporting official serves; (iii)  Any law enforcement agency with jurisdiction; or (iv)  The state ethics commission or an authorized county ethics board. (2)  Failure to report bribery is a misdemeanor. (3) For the purposes of this section, "state elected official" means any person whose salary is determined by the commission on salaries pursuant to article XVI, section 3.5 of the Hawaii State Constitution or section 26-56." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on March 22, 2075.